Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2397.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6109 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6109. Specific powers of department and local authorities.* * *(k) Indemnification of elected officials not required.--The department may not deny a permit for a procession, special activity or assemblage on a State-designated highway under subsection (j) if the sponsor meets the requirements of subsection (j) but does not indemnify elected officials participating in the procession, special activity or assemblage.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617